steps/deDE step 1 converted to UTF8/dictionaries/de-DE.dic
Ahnden/SJm
Anerkenntnis/qm
Ankauf/STpmij
Anmerken/SJm
Archenholz/Tm
Aufstellen/SJm
Auftrag/pSTJm
Bagdad/Sm
Basketball/Spmij
Bayreuth/RSm
Beaufsichtigen/SJm
Bedürfnis/Qqmij
Begräbnis/Qqmij
Behältnis/Qqmij
Beschalten/SJm
Besorgnis/qm
Besteck/EPTSmij
Bildnis/Qqm
Bistum/Sm
Bitbus/Qqm
Brett/RSTMmij
Bündnis/Qqmij
Buchsbaum/STpm
Darbieten/SJm
Deformieren/SJm
Diskurs/EPTm
Diskus/Qqm
Eingeborene/NRm
Einlieferer/NSFm
Einschlag/pSTm
Einschulen/SJm
Einverständnis/Qqmij
Ereignis/Qqmij
Ergänzen/SJm
Erlaubnis/qm
Erlebnis/Qqm
Erzeugnis/Qqm
Export/EPSTmij
Fahrer/FNSmgij
Faxanschluss/Tpm
Fortbewegen/SJm
Gast/Tmij
Gebotsschild/RSTm
Gefängnis/Qqmij
Geheimnis/Qqmij
Geiselnehmer/NSFm
Genickschlag/STpm
Gesicht/RSTm
Geständnis/Qqm
Gezeitenstrom/STm
Gleichnis/Qqm
Hanoi/Sm
Hindernis/Qqmij
Imbiss/EPTmij
Inlandmarkt/STpm
Jacob/S
Katalogisieren/SJm
Kind/MRTSm
Kommissionär/EPSm
Komplettierungsauftrag/STpm
Kompromiss/EPTmij
Kürbis/Qqm
Lied/MRSTm
Lufthansa/S
Madonnenbild/STRm
Mahlerzeugnis/Qqm
Manövrierraum/STpm
Matchball/Spm
Misshandeln/SJm
Mohnfeld/RTm
Mystiker/FNSm
Niederschlag/pSm
Omnibus/Qqmij
Paket/EPSTmij
Pakistan/RSm
Penis/Qqmij
Pennäler/NSFm
Prämienzuschlag/STpm
Ratifizieren/SJm
Raub/STmij
Rausschmiss/TEPm
Redmond/SRm
Säumniszuschlag/STpm
Scheusal/EPSm
Schienbein/ESPTm
Schneckenhaus/Tpm
Seil/RSTEPmij
Skript/PSTm
Sohn/ESTm
Spezialisieren/SJm
Stoppelfeld/RTm
Suggestionsbedürfnis/Qqm
Syndrom/SEPm
Syntaxbaum/STpm
Talmud/STEP
Tilsit/Rm
Überschwang/STm
Ukas/Qqm
Umkehr/Jmij
Unfall/STpmij
Ungetüm/SEPTm
Unverständnis/Qqm
Urbild/RSm
Verformen/SJm
Verhältnis/Qqm
Vermächtnis/Qqm
Vermutungswissen/Sm
Verringern/SJm
Versäumnis/Qqmij
Verzerren/SJm
Vorkommnis/Qqm
Vorlesungsverzeichnis/Qqm
Vortrag/pSTm
Wankelmut/TSm
Wiederhaken/dSdij
Wildbrett/dRST
Zeugnis/Qqmij
Zukauf/STpm
abbiegen/SJozm
abfall/STpozm
abglich/ZE
ableiten/BDIXY
abmahnen/BDIXY
abschied/Z
abschürfen/DIXY
abschwenken/DIXY
absegeln/DIXY
abteilen/BDIXY
abtöten/DIXY
abwog/Z
adsorbieren/DIOXY
albatros/Qqozm
albtraum/STpozm
alliieren/DIOXYW
altern/SJozm
angestellte/NRozm
angriff/ZE
angrinsen/DIXY
ankleben/DIXY
anklicken/BDIXY
anlächeln/DIXY
ansteuern/BDIXY
antizipieren/BDIOXY
ass/PETozm
atomisieren/SJozm
aufblieb/ZE
auffächern/BDIXY
aufgang/STpozm
aufhaben/DI
aufkriegen/IXY
aufmarschieren/DIOXY
aufpinseln/DIXY
aufwarten/SJozm
aufwies/ZE
ausdehnen/BDIXY
ausdenken/BDIX
ausfransen/DIXY
aushelfen/DI
auslöffeln/DIXY
ausschuss/TpMozm
ausstellen/BDIXY
austilgen/DIXY
auszuleihen/D
bäumte/Z
bebildern/IOXYW
bedrucken/SJozm
bedürfnis/Qqozm
befolgen/DIOXY
begutachten/BDIOXY
behältnis/Qqozm
behaupten/BDIOXY
beherrschen/BDIOXY
bekleckern/DIOXYW
belagern/DIOXY
bereithielt/Z
beschneiden/SJozm
beschönigen/DIOXY
beschworen/AWX
bestechen/DI
betatschen/IOXY
beteiligte/RNozm
betrieben/AWX
bewalden/BDIXY
bezahlvorgang/STpozm
bildnis/Qqozm
bitternis/qozm
blich/Z
blockieren/DIOXY
bloßstellen/DIXY
braten/VDIW
buxtehude/Sozm
dazuverdienen/DIOXY
dekomprimieren/BDIOXY
demobilisieren/SJozm
demokratisieren/BDIOXY
demoralisieren/BDIOXY
ding/ETPRSozm
diskriminieren/DIOXYW
diskus/Qqozm
dosiswert/EPSTozm
draufgehen/DIX
drüberfuhr/Z
durchleuchten/DIOXY
durchsetzen/BDIOXY
durchvögeln/DIXYn
einbüßen/DIXY
einkopieren/DIOXY
einritt/Z
einsparen/BDIXY
einteilen/SJozm
elektrisieren/DIOXY
emporstemmen/DIXY
entblößen/DIOXY
entflohen/AWX
entlangzog/Z
entsperren/BDIOXYW
erdulden/BDIOXY
erfordernis/Qqozm
erguss/Tpozm
erinnern/DIOXY
erklären/SJozm
erklang/Z
ermatten/DIOXY
erobern/DIOXY
erwidern/DIOXY
erzwingen/BDIX
erzwingen/SJozm
eskortieren/BDIOXYW
fäulnis/qozm
fasan/EPSTozm
findelkind/TRSozm
flanieren/DIXYW
flösse/Z
fokussieren/DIOXY
formen/BDIVXY
formulieren/BDIOXY
fungieren/DIXYW
gängeln/SJozm
gedächtnis/Qqozm
gedröhn/ESTozm
geld/ERTSozm
geschehnis/Qqozm
gewichten/DIOXY
ging/VZ
gleichnis/Qqozm
grammgewicht/SEPTozm
grölen/DIXY
gutschreiben/DIX
harburger/NSFozm
hauchen/DIXYW
hauen/DIVXYW
hauptangeklagte/NRozm
haus/Tpozm
herausnehmen/BDI
herauswarf/Z
herrschen/DIXY
herumlaufen/DI
hinaufgehen/IXD
hinausging/ZE
hinausposaunen/IXYD
hindernis/Qqozm
hinterherlaufen/DI
hinzurechnen/DIXY
hochschoss/Z
innovieren/DIOXY
invertieren/BDIOXY
jahr/EPSTozm
kartographieren/BDIOXYW
kauern/DIXYW
kehrtmachen/DIXY
klonen/BDIXYW
knacken/DIXYW
körnen/SJozm
konkretisieren/BDIOXY
koranvers/EPTozm
korrigieren/BDIOXY
kostverächter/NSFozm
kriegen/DIXYW
kuckucksei/RSTozm
leasen/DIXY
leidtragen/ID
lizenzierungsantrag/STpozm
loch/STRozm
lohnen/DIXY
marienbild/RTozm
mechanisieren/BDIOXYW
merkmal/EPSTozm
mischen/BDIXYW
missverhältnis/Qqozm
mitbelasten/DIOXY
mitdachte/Z
modifizieren/BDIOXY
nachforschen/DIXY
nachmachen/DIXY
nachverhandeln/BDIOXY
neunzig/R
oktaeder/NSozm
operationalisieren/IXYOB
pausen/DIXYke
pfostenschuss/Tpozm
piksen/DIXYW
platzieren/BDIOXY
posaunen/DIXYWke
protestieren/DIXY
rannte/VZ
rechen/IXYD
reduzieren/DIOXYW
regenerieren/SJozm
rekord/EPSTRozm
renaturieren/BDIOXYW
rentieren/DIXY
resultat/EPSTozm
rümpfen/DIXYW
rumpeln/DIXYW
saulgau/Sozm
schematisieren/DIOXY
schlurfen/DIXY
schluss/Tpozm
schob/VZ
schrecknis/Qqozm
schreiben/DIVXW
schwächeln/DIXYW
schwingen/DIX
skalieren/BDIXY
spritzenhaus/Tpozm
staffeln/DIXY
stehen/DIXW
stieß/VZ
stopplicht/STRozm
stricken/DIVXY
subsidiaritätsprinzip/Sozm
tadeln/DIXY
tastverhältnis/Qqozm
testen/BDIXY
triangulieren/DIOXYW
trutzbündnis/Qqozm
überantworten/DIOXY
überbelasten/IXYDO
überliefern/DIOXY
übersah/Z
überspannen/IXYDO
übertrag/pSTozm
umflogen/AWX
umprogrammieren/BDIOXY
umrennen/DIX
umschulden/SJozm
umzuschulden/D
unterblieb/ZE
unterweisen/DIX
unterzeichnen/DIOXY
verantwortliche/NRozm
verewigen/DIOXY
verführen/BDIOXY
verglühen/DIOXYW
vergrämen/DIOXY
verguss/Tpozm
verhängnis/Qqozm
verkohlen/DIOXY
verlängern/BDIOXYW
verpfänden/SJozm
verschachern/DIOXY
verschmelzen/SJozm
verschworen/AWX
versenken/BDIOXY
verständnis/Qqozm
vertragen/I
verweltlichen/DIOXY
verzollen/BDIOXY
vorausging/Z
vorbeischießen/DIX
vorproduzieren/BDIOXY
wagnis/Qqozm
wahrsagen/DIXY
wegging/ZE
wettmachen/BDIXY
widerrätst/X
widersetzen/DIXY
wiegeln/DIXYW
wuseln/DIXYW
zerfloss/Z
zergehen/DIXW
zerstoßen/ADIW
zirkelschluss/Tpozm
zueinanderfinden/DIX
zuknöpfen/DIXY
zurückhielt/Z
zurückreichen/IXYD
zurücksetzen/IXYD
zweigen/IVXY
zwirbeln/DIXYW
